Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska52-804
Sale; disposition of proceeds; when payable to owner.

The person, firm, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation to whom the charges are payable shall (1) deduct the charges due plus the costs of notifying the owner and the costs, if any, of publishing the notice of sale from the proceeds of such sale, (2) hold the overplus, if any, subject to the order of the owner, (3) immediately thereafter mail to the owner or owners thereof at such owner's or owners' address, if known, a notice stating the sale has been had, and (4) the amount of overplus, if any, due such owner or owners and, at any time within twelve months, upon demand by the owner or owners pay to the owner or owners the balance or overplus in the hands of such person, firm, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation.

Laws 1943, c. 120, § 4, p. 417;

R.S.1943, § 52-804;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 312.